Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,119
Judges; number; presiding judge.

(1) The number of judges of the separate juvenile court in counties which have established a separate juvenile court shall be:

(a) Two judges in counties having seventy-five thousand inhabitants but less than three hundred thousand inhabitants;

(b) Four judges in counties having at least three hundred thousand inhabitants but less than five hundred thousand inhabitants; and

(c) Six judges in counties having five hundred thousand inhabitants or more.

(2) The senior judge in point of service as a juvenile court judge shall be the presiding judge. The judges shall rotate the office of presiding judge every three years unless the judges agree to another system.

Laws 1972, LB 1362, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 446, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 669, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 43-233.01;

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 76;

Laws 1995, LB 19, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 404, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 23, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB377, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB10, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB1085, § 1.